Maryland, session 2025, SB0140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–416 through 7–421 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–417 through 7–422, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–416.
THE GOVERNOR ANNUALLY SHALL PROCLAIM AUGUST 31 AS OVERDOSE
AWARENESS DAY.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.